North Dakota statutes. TITLE 52 Social Security
CHAPTER 52-06 Benefits
52-06-06.1.
Weekly benefit reduction for child support.

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing such claim, disclose whether or not the individual owes child support obligations as defined under subsection 7. If any such individual discloses that the individual owes child support obligations, and is determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation, the bureau shall notify the state or local child support enforcement agency enforcing such obligation that the individual has been determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

The bureau shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation payable to an individual that owes child support obligations as defined under subsection 7:

The amount specified by the individual to the bureau to be deducted and withheld under this subsection, if neither subdivision b nor c are applicable;

The amount, if any, determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the bureau under section 454(20)(B)(i) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 654(20)(B)(i)] by the state or local child support enforcement agency, unless subdivision c is applicable; or

Any amount otherwise required to be so deducted and withheld from such unemployment compensation pursuant to legal process, as that term is defined in section 459(i)(5) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 659(i)(5)], properly served upon the bureau.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection 2 must be paid by the bureau to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency.

Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection 2 must for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment compensation and paid by such individual to the state or local child support enforcement agency in satisfaction of the individual’s child support obligations.

For purposes of subsections 1 through 4, the term “unemployment compensation” means any compensation payable under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, including amounts payable by the bureau pursuant to an agreement under any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to unemployment.

This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement agency for the administrative costs incurred by the bureau under this section which are attributable to child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child support enforcement agency.

The term “child support obligations” is defined for purposes of these provisions as including only obligations which are being enforced pursuant to a plan described in section 454 of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 654] which has been approved by the secretary of health and human services under part D of title IV of the Social Security Act.

The term “state or local child support enforcement agency”, as used in these provisions, means any agency of this state or a political subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in subsection 7.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 541, § 2; 2001, ch. 55, § 20.

52-06-07.
Wages payable prior to January 1, 1941, deemed wages paid within calendar quarter.

For the purposes of section 52-06-04 and subsection 30 of section 52-01-01, wages payable to an individual for insured work performed prior to January 1, 1941, must be deemed to be wages paid within the calendar quarter with respect to which such wages were paid.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 261, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 52-0607.

52-06-08.
Claims for benefits — How made.

Claims for benefits under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law must be made in accordance with such regulations as the bureau may prescribe.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. a; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 52-0608.

52-06-09.
Determinations upon claim filed — Contents.

A determination upon a claim filed pursuant to section 52-06-08 must be made promptly by an examiner and must include a statement as to whether and in what amount the claimant is entitled to benefits for the weeks with respect to which the determination is made and in the event of a denial must include a statement of the reasons therefor. A determination with respect to the first week of a benefit year also must include a statement as to whether the claimant has been paid the wages required under section 52-06-04 and if so, the first day of the benefit year, the claimant’s weekly benefit amount, and the maximum total amount of benefits payable to the claimant with respect to such benefit year.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. c, subd. 1; R.C. 1943, § 52-0609.

Collateral References.

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in unemployment compensation proceedings, 90 A.L.R.4th 532.

52-06-10.
Determinations in labor dispute cases.

Whenever any claim for benefits under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law involves the application of the provisions of subsection 4 of section 52-06-02, the examiner handling the claim, if so directed by the bureau, shall transmit such claim promptly to the appeals referee for the purpose of making a determination upon the issues involved under that section or upon such claim. The appeals referee shall make the determination on the claim after such investigation as the appeals referee deems necessary and after affording the parties entitled to notice an opportunity for a fair hearing in accordance with the provisions of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law with respect to hearings and determinations of the appeal tribunals. The parties must be notified promptly of the determination, together with the reasons therefor, in the event of the denial of the claim. Such determination must be deemed to be the final decision on the claim, unless within seven days of the mailing of the notice to a party’s last-known address, or in the absence of such mailing, within ten days after the delivery of such notice, an appeal is filed with the bureau.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. c, subd. 2; R.C. 1943, § 52-0610.

52-06-11.
Determination of benefits for individual who secures work on a regular attachment basis.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, the bureau, by regulation, may prescribe that the existence of unemployment, the eligibility for benefits, and the amount of benefits shall be determined for that portion of the week occurring before or after a separation from, or securing of, work in the case of any otherwise eligible claimant who, within a week of unemployment, is separated from or secures work on a regular attachment basis. Such rules must be reasonably calculated to secure general results substantially similar to those provided by the North Dakota unemployment compensation law with respect to weeks of unemployment.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 5, subs. g; 1939, ch. 215, § 5; 1941, ch. 261, § 3, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 52-0611.

52-06-12.
Notice of determinations — Dispensing with.

Notice of a determination upon a claim must be given promptly to the claimant by delivery thereof or by mailing such notice to the claimant’s last-known address. In addition, notice of any determination which involves the application of the provisions of section 52-06-02 together with the reasons therefor, must be given promptly in the same manner to the last employing unit by whom the claimant was employed. The bureau may dispense with the giving of notice of any determination to any employing unit and such employing unit shall not be entitled to such notice if it has failed to indicate prior to the determination if and as required by regulation of the bureau, that such employing unit was the claimant’s base-period employer, as defined in the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, and that the claimant may be ineligible or disqualified under any provisions of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. c, subd. 4; R.C. 1943, § 52-0612.

52-06-12.1.
Determination of eligibility — Notification of charges.

The bureau shall, upon determination of an individual’s eligibility for benefits chargeable against each base-period employer’s account, notify each of the individual’s base-period employers, including employers electing to finance benefit payments on a reimbursable basis, of the individual’s eligibility and maximum potential charges against the base-period employer’s account resulting from the individual’s eligibility for benefits.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 529, § 1.

52-06-13.
Notice of appeal from determination — Filing — Hearing — Special notice required.

The claimant or any other party entitled to a notice of a determination as provided in the North Dakota unemployment compensation law may file an appeal from such determination with the appeal tribunal within twelve days after the date of mailing of the notice to the person’s last-known address or, if such notice is not mailed, within twelve days after the service of such notice. Unless the appeal is withdrawn with the permission of the appeal tribunal or is removed to the bureau, the appeal tribunal after affording the parties reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing shall make findings and conclusions and on the basis thereof shall affirm, modify, or reverse such determination. Whenever an appeal involves a question as to whether services were performed by the claimant in employment or for an employer, the tribunal shall give special notice of such issue and of the pendency of the appeal to the employing unit and to the bureau, both of whom thenceforth shall be parties to the proceeding and must be afforded a reasonable opportunity to adduce evidence bearing on such question.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subss. b, c; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 2; R.C. 1943, § 52-0613; S.L. 1953, ch. 300, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0613.

52-06-14.
Appeal tribunals — How comprised — Duties — Fees — Alternates — Chairman.

The bureau shall appoint one or more impartial appeal examiners known as the appeal tribunal, who shall hear and decide appealed claims. Each such tribunal shall consist of a referee selected in accordance with chapter 52-02, or a body composed of three members, one of whom must be a referee who shall serve as chairman and who must be a salaried full-time member of the staff of the job insurance division, and one of whom must be a representative of employers, and the other of whom must be a representative of employees. Each of the latter two members may be selected without regard to section 52-02-06 and shall serve at the pleasure of the bureau and be paid a fee of twenty-five dollars per day of active service on such tribunal, plus necessary expenses. The bureau may designate alternates to serve in the absence or disqualification of any member of an appeal tribunal. The chairman shall act alone in the absence or disqualification of any other member or member’s alternates. In no case may the hearings proceed unless the chairman of the appeal tribunal is present.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. d; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 1; R.C. 1943, § 52-0614; S.L. 1965, ch. 333, § 5; 1983, ch. 82, § 111.

52-06-15.
Appeal tribunal’s decision — Copy to be furnished — To be final — Exception.

The parties must be notified promptly of an appeal tribunal’s decision upon an appeal taken as is provided in section 52-06-13 and must be furnished with a copy of the decision and the findings and conclusions in support thereof. The decision is final unless, within twelve days after the date of mailing the notice thereof to the party’s last-known address, or in the absence of such mailing, within twelve days after the delivery of such notice, further review is initiated pursuant to section 52-06-19.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 2; R.C. 1943, § 52-0615; S.L. 1953, ch. 300, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 52-0615; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 112.

52-06-16.
When redeterminations made by division — Notice.

The job insurance division may reconsider a determination of a claim whenever it finds:

That an error in computation or identity has occurred in connection therewith;

That wages of the claimant pertinent to such determination but not considered in connection therewith have been newly discovered; or

That benefits have been allowed or denied or the amount of benefits fixed on the basis of a misrepresentation of facts.

No such redetermination may be made after two years from the day of the original determination, except that a reconsidered determination involving a finding that benefits have been allowed or denied or the amount of benefits fixed on the basis of nondisclosure or misrepresentations of fact may be made within three years from the date of the determination. Notice of any such redetermination must be given promptly to the parties entitled to the notice or original determination and in the manner prescribed in section 52-06-12.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. e; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. c, subd. 3; R.C. 1943, § 52-0616; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 10; 1957 Supp., § 52-0616; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 113; 1985, ch. 543, § 7.

52-06-17.
Appeal from redetermination — Regulations governing.

If the amount of benefits is increased upon such redetermination, an appeal from the redetermination, solely with respect to the matters involved in such increase, may be filed in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in this chapter. If the amount of benefits is decreased upon such redetermination, the matters involved in such decrease shall be subject to review in connection with an appeal from any determination upon a subsequent claim for benefits which may be affected in amount or duration by such redetermination. Subject to the same limitations and for the same reasons, the job insurance division may reconsider the determination in any case in which the final decision has been rendered by an appeal tribunal, the bureau, or a court and may apply to that body or court which rendered such final decision to issue a revised decision.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. e; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. c, subd. 3; R.C. 1943, § 52-0617; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 11; 1957 Supp., § 52-0617; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 114.

52-06-18.
When appeal from original determination treated as appeal from redetermination.

If an appeal involving an original determination is pending as of the date a redetermination thereof is issued, such appeal, unless withdrawn, must be treated as an appeal from such redetermination.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. e; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. c, subd. 3; R.C. 1943, § 52-0618.

52-06-19.
Review of decision of appeal tribunal by the bureau.

The bureau, on its own motion, and within the time specified in section 52-06-15, may initiate a review of the decision of the appeal tribunal or may allow an appeal from such decision upon an application filed within such time by any party entitled to notice of such decision. An appeal filed by such parties must be allowed as a matter of right if such decision was not unanimous or if the examiner’s determination was not affirmed by the appeal tribunal. Upon a review on its own motion, or upon an appeal, the bureau upon the basis of the evidence previously submitted in such case or upon the basis of such additional evidence as it may direct to be taken, may affirm, modify, or reverse the findings and conclusions of the appeal tribunal. The bureau may remove to itself or transfer to another appeal tribunal the proceedings on any claim pending before an appeal tribunal. Any proceedings removed to the bureau prior to the completion of a fair hearing must be heard by the bureau in the same manner as proceedings before an appeal tribunal. The bureau shall notify promptly the parties to any proceeding before it of its decision, including its findings and conclusions in support thereof. Such decision is final unless within thirty days after the mailing of a notice thereof to the party’s last-known address, or in the absence of such mailing, within thirty days after service of such notice, a proceeding for a judicial review is initiated pursuant to section 52-06-27. Upon a denial by the bureau of an application for appeal from the decision of the appeal tribunal, the decision of the appeal tribunal must be deemed to be a decision of the bureau within the meaning of this section for the purposes of judicial review and is subject to judicial review within the time and in the manner provided with respect to decisions of the bureau, except that the time for initiating such review must run from the date of notice of the order by the bureau denying the application for appeal.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. e; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 3; R.C. 1943, § 52-0619; S.L. 1953, ch. 300, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 52-0619; S.L. 1973, ch. 391, § 14.

52-06-20.
Procedure in hearings and appeals — Consolidating claims.

The bureau and appeal tribunal shall not be bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical rules of procedure, but any hearing or appeal before such tribunals must be conducted in such manner as to ascertain the substantial rights of the parties. The bureau shall adopt reasonable regulations governing the manner of filing appeals and the conduct of hearings and appeals, consistent with the provisions of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. When the same or substantially similar evidence is relevant and material to the matters in issue in claims by more than one individual or in claims by a single individual with respect to two or more weeks of unemployment, the same time and place for considering each such claim may be fixed, hearings thereon jointly conducted, a single record of the proceedings made, and evidence adduced with respect to one proceeding considered as introduced in the others when, in the judgment of the appeal tribunal having jurisdiction of the proceeding, such consolidation would not be prejudicial to any party. No person may participate on behalf of the bureau in any case in which the person has a direct or indirect interest.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. f; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 4; R.C. 1943, § 52-0620.

52-06-21.
Conclusiveness of determinations and decisions.

Any right, fact, or matter in issue directly passed upon or necessarily involved in a determination or redetermination which has become final, or which has become final following a decision or appeal under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, is conclusive for all the purposes of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law as between the bureau, the claimant, and all employing units who had notice of such determination, redetermination, or decisions. Any determination, redetermination, or decision as to rights to benefits which has become final and conclusive in accordance with this section is not subject to collateral attack by any employing unit, irrespective of notice. As used in this section, “collateral attack by any employing unit” includes a collateral attack by a reimbursing or contributory base-period employer on a final and conclusive determination of benefits involving a different employer provided that an employer challenging the propriety of charging any benefits paid as a result of a final determination, redetermination, or decision is entitled to receive data and information from job service North Dakota concerning the monetary basis for the claimant’s right to the benefits at issue. Provided further, that at any hearing on the challenge, job service North Dakota is not required to call or subpoena the claimant or the claimant’s last or most recent employer as a witness.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. h; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 5; R.C. 1943, § 52-0621; 2003, ch. 443, § 1.

52-06-22.
Rule of decision.

The final decisions of the bureau or of an appeal tribunal and the principles of law declared by it in arriving at such decisions, unless expressly or impliedly overruled by a later decision of the bureau or by a court of competent jurisdiction, are binding upon the bureau and any appeal tribunal in subsequent proceedings which involve similar questions of law. In any subsequent proceeding, if the job insurance division or any appeal tribunal has serious doubt as to the correctness of any principle so declared, the division or appeal tribunal may certify its findings of fact in the case, together with the question of law involved, to the bureau, which after giving notice and reasonable opportunity for hearing upon the law to all parties to such proceeding thereupon shall certify to the division, or to the appeal tribunal, and the parties, its answer to the questions submitted. If the question thus certified to the bureau arises in connection with a claim for benefits, the bureau in its discretion may remove to itself the entire proceedings on such claim, and after proceeding in accordance with the requirements of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law with respect to proceedings before an appeal tribunal, shall render its decision upon the entire claim. Any decision made under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law after the removal of the proceedings upon a claim to the bureau has the effect of a decision under section 52-06-19 and is subject to judicial review within the same time and to the same extent.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. i; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 6; R.C. 1943, § 52-0622; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 115.

52-06-23.
Administering oaths — Taking depositions — Compelling attendance of witnesses and memoranda — Penalty.

In the discharge of the duties imposed by the North Dakota unemployment compensation law, the chairman of an appeal tribunal, or any duly authorized representative or member of the bureau, may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify to official acts, and issue a subpoena to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records deemed necessary as evidence in connection with a disputed claim or the administration of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. Any person who willfully fails to obey a subpoena issued under this section, unless good cause for failure to obey is shown, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 11, subs. g; R.C. 1943, § 52-0623; S.L. 1989, ch. 607, § 1.

52-06-24.
Record of testimony to be kept — Witness fees.

A record must be kept of all testimony and proceedings before the bureau or in connection with any appeal, but the testimony need not be transcribed unless further review is initiated. Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to this chapter must be allowed fees at the rate specified by law, and the fees of such witnesses subpoenaed either by the bureau or on behalf of any party to said appeal must be deemed part of the expenses of administering the North Dakota unemployment compensation law.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subss. f, g; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 4; R.C. 1943, § 52-0624.

Cross-References.

Expert witness fees, see § 28-26-06.

Fees for witnesses, see § 31-01-16.

52-06-25.
Order issued by court upon failure to obey subpoena — Failure to obey order.

In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, any court of this state within the jurisdiction of which the inquiry is carried on or within the jurisdiction of which the person guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found or resides or transacts business, upon application by the chairman of an appeal tribunal or the bureau or its duly authorized representative, shall have jurisdiction to issue to such person an order requiring such person to appear before an appeal tribunal or the bureau, or its duly authorized representative, there to produce evidence, if so ordered, or there to give testimony touching the matter under investigation or in question. Any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 11, subs. h; R.C. 1943, § 52-0625.

52-06-26.
Self-incrimination not to exempt person from testifying — Regulations governing.

No person may be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and other records before the chairman of an appeal tribunal, the bureau or any member thereof, or any duly authorized representative of the bureau, in any cause or proceeding before the bureau, on the grounds that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person, may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture. No individual may be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the individual is compelled, after having claimed the individual’s privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, except that such individual so testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 11, subs. i; R.C. 1943, § 52-0626.

Cross-References.

Perjury, see §§ 12.1-11-01, 12.1-11-02.

Privilege against self-incrimination, see N.D. Const., Art. I, § 12; § 31-01-09.

52-06-27.
Judicial review of decision — Petition — Filing.

A party to proceedings before the bureau may obtain a judicial review of the decision of the bureau by filing a petition for review within thirty days after the date of mailing the bureau’s decision to the party at the party’s last-known address, or in the absence of mailing, within thirty days after delivery of the decision to the party. The petition for review must be filed in the district court of the county in which the petitioner resides, must be verified, and must state the grounds upon which review is sought. All other parties to the proceeding before the bureau must be parties respondent. The bureau is deemed to be a party to any such proceeding. If the bureau is a party respondent, the petition must be served upon it by leaving with it or its chairman, or any other representative as it may designate for that purpose, as many copies of the petition as there are respondents. With its answer or petition, the bureau shall certify and file with the court a verified copy of the record of the case, including all documents and papers and a transcript of all testimony taken in the matter, together with the bureau’s findings, conclusions, and decision therein. Upon the filing of a petition for review by the bureau or upon the service of the petition upon it, the bureau forthwith shall send by registered mail to each other party to the proceeding a copy of such petition and such mailing is deemed to be completed service upon all such parties. In any proceeding under this section the finding of the bureau as to the facts, if supported by evidence and in the absence of fraud, is conclusive and the review by the court must be confined to questions of law. Such proceedings must be heard by the court and must be given precedence over all other civil cases except cases arising under the workforce safety and insurance statute of this state. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the district court to the supreme court of this state in the same manner as is provided in civil cases. Upon the final termination of such judicial proceeding, the bureau shall enter an order in accordance with the mandate of the court.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. i; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 7; R.C. 1943, § 52-0627; S.L. 1945, ch. 284, § 12; 1955, ch. 305, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 52-0627; S.L. 1979, ch. 107, § 7; 1989, ch. 69, § 58; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

52-06-28.
Bureau entitled to notice upon claim for benefits — Attorney upon judicial review.

The bureau is entitled to notice as a party in any proceeding involving a claim for benefits before the bureau or an appeal tribunal. In any proceeding for judicial review pursuant to section 52-06-27, the bureau may be represented by the attorney employed by it for that purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. j; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. d, subd. 8; R.C. 1943, § 52-0628.

52-06-29.
Payment of benefits.

Benefits must be promptly paid in accordance with a determination or redetermination regardless of any appeal or pending appeal. If a determination allowing benefits is affirmed in any amount by an appeals referee or is so affirmed by the bureau or if a decision of an appeals referee allowing benefits is affirmed in any amount by the bureau, such benefits must be promptly paid regardless of any further appeal and no injunction, supersedeas, stay, or other writ or process suspending the payment of such benefits may be issued by any court but if such decision is finally reversed, no employer’s account may be charged with benefits so paid pursuant to the erroneous determination, except on those employer accounts which make payments in lieu of contributions, and benefits may not be paid for any subsequent weeks of unemployment involved in such reversal. Benefits due and payable to a deceased or judicially declared incompetent person may be paid in accordance with such regulations as the bureau shall prescribe, to the person or persons, payment to whom the bureau finds would effectuate the purposes of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law. Such regulations need not conform to the statutes applicable to the descent and distribution of decedents’ estates. A receipt from the person or persons to whom the bureau makes payment shall fully discharge the fund and the bureau from liability for such benefits.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. e; R.C. 1943, § 52-0629; S.L. 1951, ch. 293, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 52-0629; S.L. 1973, ch. 391, § 15.

52-06-30.
Assignment of benefits prohibited — Benefits exempt from remedies for collection of debt — Exception.

No assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of any right to benefits which are or may become due or payable under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law is valid. Such rights to benefits are exempt from levy, execution, attachment, or any other remedy provided for the collection of a debt. Benefits received by any individual, as long as they are not mingled with other funds of the recipient, are exempt from any remedy for the collection of all debts except debts incurred for necessaries furnished to the individual, that person’s spouse, or dependents during the time when the individual was unemployed. No waiver of any exemption provided for in this subsection is valid. However, this subsection does not impair the operation of subsection 2 or section 52-06-06.1 or the continuous levy authorized under Public Law No. 105-34, section 1024 [111 Stat. 923-924; 26 U.S.C. 6331(h)].

An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation benefits, at the time of filing the claim, must be advised that:

Unemployment compensation is subject to federal income tax and state income tax;

Requirements exist pertaining to estimated federal and state tax payments;

The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s payment of unemployment compensation benefits at the amount specified in the federal Internal Revenue Code;

The individual, having elected to have federal income tax withheld, may also elect to have state income tax deducted and withheld from the individual’s payment of unemployment compensation at a rate determined by the tax commissioner pursuant to section 57-38-59; and

The individual is permitted to change a previously elected withholding status. Amounts deducted and withheld from unemployment compensation must remain in the unemployment fund until transferred to the federal and state taxing authority as payment of income tax. The bureau shall follow all procedures specified by the United States department of labor, the federal internal revenue service, and the tax commissioner pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax. Amounts must be deducted and withheld under this section only after amounts are deducted and withheld for any overpayments of unemployment compensation, child support obligations, or any other amounts required to be deducted and withheld under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 16, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 52-0630; S.L. 1983, ch. 541, § 3; 1997, ch. 423, § 1; 1999, ch. 438, § 1.

52-06-31.
Waiver of rights of individual prohibited.

No agreement by any individual to waive, release, or commute the individual’s rights to benefits or any other rights under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law is valid. No agreement by any individual in the employ of any person or concern to pay all or any portion of an employer’s contributions, required under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law from such employer, is valid. No employer may make, require, or accept, directly or indirectly, any deduction from wages to finance the employer’s contributions required from the employer, nor require nor accept any waiver of any right hereunder by any individual in the employer’s employ. However, this section does not impair the operation of section 52-06-06.1.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 16, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0631; S.L. 1983, ch. 541, § 4.

52-06-32.
Individual claiming benefits not to be charged fees by bureau — Fees of individual’s attorney.

A claimant may not be charged fees by the bureau or by any court or officer thereof in any proceeding under this chapter. Any party in any proceeding before the bureau may be represented by counsel or other duly authorized agent. A claimant’s attorney’s fees for representation in district court must be paid by the bureau, in an amount determined to be reasonable by the bureau, if the claimant finally prevails; however, the bureau may not pay attorney’s fees if the claimant’s attorney is employed by or contracting with a legal services organization funded totally or in part by public funds. A claimant’s attorney’s fees are those fees charged to the claimant by the attorney and which would otherwise be payable by the claimant to the attorney. The bureau may not pay attorney’s fees for representation in any proceeding before the bureau or its representatives.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 16, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 52-0632; S.L. 1985, ch. 543, § 8; 1987, ch. 601, § 1.

52-06-33.
Recovery and recoupment — Penalty.

A person who has received any amount of benefits under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law to which the person is not entitled shall be liable to refund to the bureau for the fund the amount so paid or to have such amount deducted from any future benefits payable to the person under the North Dakota unemployment compensation law or the unemployment compensation law of another state or the federal government following a finding that such payment occurred. Such findings shall have become final and shall specify the reason for such finding, the week or weeks for which such benefits were paid, and the amount of benefits so paid. The bureau, in its discretion, may release such person from liability to refund when it finds that recovery would be contrary to equity and good conscience. Amounts determined collectible may be so collected by civil action in the name of the bureau. If the bureau has found that the individual has made a false statement for the purpose of obtaining unemployment compensation benefits to which the individual was not lawfully entitled, the bureau shall assess a monetary penalty of fifteen percent of the amount of unemployment compensation benefits overpaid. The penalty must be applied to all forms of state and federal unemployment compensation and the federally mandated penalty amounts collected must be deposited in the state unemployment compensation fund. Amounts unpaid on the date on which they are due and payable, as determined by the bureau, may bear interest at the rate of one and one-half percent per month from and after that date until payment plus accrued interest is received by the bureau. However, no interest may be assessed for the first one hundred eighty days on any overpayment when the bureau has found that the individual did not make a false statement to obtain benefits to which the individual was not lawfully entitled.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. b; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 52-0633; S.L. 1951, ch. 293, § 4; 1955, ch. 304, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 52-0633; S.L. 1977, ch. 468, § 1; 1989, ch. 603, § 3; 2013, ch. 394, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 394, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

52-06-34.
Benefits payable only to extent provided — State or bureau not liable for excess sums.

Benefits may be deemed to be due and payable under this chapter only to the extent provided in this chapter and to the extent that moneys are available therefor to the credit of the unemployment compensation fund. Neither the state nor the bureau is liable for any amount in excess of such sums.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 52-0634.

52-06-35.
Statements relating to benefit rights and claims to be posted — Regulations governing.

Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessible to individuals in the employer’s employ printed statements concerning benefit rights, claims for benefits, and such other matters relating to the administration of the North Dakota unemployment compensation law as the bureau may prescribe by regulation. Each employer shall supply to such individuals copies of such printed statements or other materials relating to claims for benefits when and as the bureau may prescribe by regulation. Such printed statements and other materials must be supplied by the bureau to each employer without cost.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 232, § 8, subs. a; 1941, ch. 261, § 6, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 52-0635.